South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4478.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 48-35-50 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 48-35-50.  (A) The State Forester may direct at any time, when deemed necessary in the interest of public safety, that fires covered by this chapter not be started. The State Forester also may prohibit all open burning regardless of whether a permit or notification is required, including campfires, bonfires, and other fires for recreational purposes. This prohibition shall not apply to fires used for nonrecreational purposes such as those for human warmth or for the preparation of food for immediate consumption. (B) In the event the State Forester directs that a fire not be started or prohibits all open burning pursuant to this section, notice must be sent to the South Carolina Emergency Management Division. The Emergency Management Division must broadcast the State Forester's direction or prohibition regarding fires on all telecommunication devices within South Carolina. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----